epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/cs.xml
		á1re
		ár2m
		á1ro
		á1ru
		á3rů
		á1s
		á2sc
		á2s3k
		ás4k.
		ás4kl
		ás4kn
		á2sla
		ás4ly
		á2sm
		ás4po
		á2st
		át3k
		át1r
		á1tu
		á1ty
		á1tí
		á3tý
		áv4si
		áv4sí
		áz3k
		áz3ni
		ázni4c
		áz4vi
		á2ň
		á1ř
		ář4ke
		ář4ků
		á2š
		á3še
		á3ší
		2č.
		1ča
		ča4br
		2čb
		2č1c
		1če
		3če.
		če1c
		čes3k
		1či
		2čk
		č3ka.
		č3ko
		č3ku
		č3ky
		2č1m
		2čn
		č2ne
		1čo
		č2p
		2čs
		č1sk
		čs4la
		čs4sr
		2č2t
		č4tené.
		č4tený
		čt4la
		č4tový.
		3čtv
		4čtěn
		č3tí
		1ču
		1čá
		1čí
		čís3l
		1čů
		2ď.
		1ďa
		1ďo
		ďs4te
		2ď1t
		3ďuj
		é1
		é2d
		é3di
		é3do
		é2f
		é3fo
		éf1r
		é2kl
		é2l
		é2m
		é3ma
		é3me
		é3mi
		é3mo
		é3mu
		é3mů
		4ére.
		é2s
		é2t
		é3ta
		é3to
		é3tá
		é2š
		é2ž
		ě1c
		ěd3r
		ě3ha
		ě3he
		ě3hl.
		ěh3lo
		ěh3n
		ě1ho
		ě3hu
		ě3hů
		ě3ja
		ě1je
		ě1jo
		ě3jů
		ě4klé
		ě3k2t
		ě1l
		ě1ra
		ěra3d
		ě1re
		ě1ro
		ěr3s
		ěrs4t
		ě1ru
		ě1ry
		ě1rů
		ěs3k
		ěs3n
		ět1a3
		ět4ac
		ět1l
		ě1tr
		ět3ra
		ě4traj
		ět3v
		ě1tí
		ět3ří
		ě2v
		ě3va
		ě3ve
		ě3vl
		ě3vo
		ě3vu
		ě3vá
		ěv3č
		ě2z
		ě3ze
		ě3zi
		ěz3n
		ě3zo
		ě3zí
		ě1ř
		ě2š
		ě3še
		ě3ši
		ě3šo
		ě3šu
		ě3šá
		ě3ší
		ěš3ť
		ěš4ťs
		ě2ť
		ě3ťo
		ě2ž
		ě3že
		ě3ži
		ě3žo
		ě3žu
		ě3ží
		í1b
		íb3ř
		í3cho
		ích4t
		íd1l
		í1h
		í2hl
		íh3n
		í1j
		íjed4
		íj4mů
		í2kr
		í1l
		í1má
		í3mé
		í1mě
		í1r
		í1sa
		í2s3k
		ís4kl
		ís4kn
		ís4l.
		ís3le
		ís4ln
		ísáh2
		í1t
		ít3k
		í3t3ře
		íz3da
		íz3de
		íz3k
		í3zna
		í3z3ni
		í3zněn
		í2ň
		í1ř
		í2š
		í3še
		í3ši
		í3šo
		í3ší
		1ň
		2ň.
		2ňa
		ňa3d
		2ňk
		2ňm
		3ňov
		ň1s
		2ň1t
		ó1
		ó2z
		ó3za
		ó3zi
		ó3zo
		ó3zy
		2ř.
		řa4pl
		řa4ďm
		2ř2b
		2řc
		2řd
		ře3ch
		ře4dob
		ře1h
		ře3jd
		ře3kl
		ře3kv
		ře4kří
		řeo4r
		ře3p2
		ře4p.
		ře4pk
		ře4pč
		řer4v
		2řes
		ře3ska
		ře3sko
		ře2sp
		řes3po
		ře4sr
		ře3sta
		ře3stu
		ře3stá
		ře3stř
		ře3tl
		řet4ř
		ře3zd
		ře3zk
		4řezl
		ře3čt
		ři1
		řia3
		ři3h
		ři4h.
		ři4hn
		ři4jď
		ři4l.
		ři4lb
		řil2n
		4řine
		řis2
		3ři4t.
		ři4v.
		ři4vk
		ři4vn
		ři3z
		řič4t
		ři3ř
		ři4š.
		2řk
		ř2kl
		řk4la
		řk4li
		řk4ly
		řk4no
		2ř1l
		2ř1m
		2řn
		1řo
		2řou
		2ř2p
		2ř1s
		řs4to
		2ř1t
		ř2v
		2řz
		řá4pl
		řá2sl
		2ř1č
		2říd
		ří4kř
		ří1s
		2řš
		ř3št
		řš4ti
		1š
		2š.
		šab3
		ša4vl
		2š1c
		šej4d
		šep3t
		ši4mr
		2š2k
		š3ka
		š3ke
		š3k3li
		4š3kou
		4škov
		3škr
		šk4ro
		š3ku.
		š3ky
		2šl
		š2la
		š2li
		š3liv
		š2lo
		šlá2
		š2lé
		š2lý
		2š1m
		šmi4d
		2šn
		š2p
		2š1s
		2št
		š4tip
		št4ka
		št4kl
		š4těk
		š2těs
		š4těv
		š4típ
		š2v
		ší3d
		š2ň
		š3ší
		2š2ť
		š3ťo
		š3ťu
		š3ťá
		1ť
		2ť.
		3ťal
		2ťk
		2ťm
		2ťt
		ťáč4k
		1ú
		ú2c2
		ú2d
		új4ma
		ú2k
		ú2l
		ú2n
		ú2p
		ú2t
		út4ko
		ú2v
		ú2z
		úz3k
		ú2č
		3úče
		úře4z
		úš4ti
		ú2ž
		ů1b
		ů1c
		ů1hl
		ů3jd
		ů4jmový
		ů1le
		ů1my
		ů1mě
		ů1ra
		ůr4va
		ůr4vy
		ů1s2
		ů2st
		ůs3te
		ůs3tán
		ůt2
		ů3tkl
		ů2v
		ů3va
		ů3vo
		ů3vě
		ů2z
		ů3zo
		ů2ž
		ů3že
		ů3ži
		ů3žo
		ý1b
		ý3cho
		ý1d
		ýd4la
		ý1h
		ý1j
		ý1l
		ý1ml
		ý1mě
		ý2n
		ý3no
		ýpo3č4
		ý1r
		ý1s2
		ý2sk
		ý1t
		ýt4ku
		ýt4ky
		ý1u
		ý4vli
		ý3zk
		ý3zn
		ý4zvu
		ýč4ně
		ý1ř
		ýš3l
		1ž
		2ž.
		ža3d
		ža4tv
		3žač
		2ž1b
		2ž1c
		2ž1d
		že2b3
		žeh3n
		že4ml
		že4zg
		ži4dl
		ži4jm
		3žil
		ži2vl
		2žk
		žk4ni
		2žl
		ž4lic
		3žlo
		2ž1m
		2žn
		žon2
		2ž1s2
		2ž1t
		ž2v
		žá4br
		žá4nr
		2žď
		ží4zn
		2žň
		2žš
		žš4ti
		žš4tě
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
